Illinois, session 104th, SB1186.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-228 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/5-228)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 5-228)7    Sec. 5-228. Administrative review. 8    (a) The provisions of the Administrative Review Law, and 9all amendments and modifications thereof and the rules adopted 10pursuant thereto, shall apply to and govern all proceedings 11for the judicial review of final administrative decisions of 12the retirement board provided for under this Article. The term 13"administrative decision" is as defined in Section 3-101 of 14the Code of Civil Procedure.15    (b) If any policeman whose application for either a duty 16disability benefit under Section 5-154, or for an occupational 17disease disability benefit under Section 5-154.1, or for an 18ordinary disability benefit under Section 5-155 has been 19denied by the Retirement Board brings an action for 20administrative review challenging the denial of disability 21benefits and the policeman prevails in the action in 22administrative review, then the prevailing policeman shall be 23entitled to recover from the Fund court costs and litigation   SB1186- 2 -LRB104 07690 RPS 17734 b1expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, as part of the 2costs of the action. 3    (c) If a policeman whose duty disability benefits, 4ordinary disability benefits, or occupational disability 5benefits are terminated by the Retirement Board brings an 6action for administrative review challenging the termination 7of those disability benefits and prevails in the action in 8administrative review, then the prevailing policeman shall be 9entitled to recover from the Fund court costs and litigation 10expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, as part of the 11costs of the action. 12(Source: P.A. 101-387, eff. 8-16-19.) 13    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 14Section 8.49 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)16    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 178 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 18the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 19Act of the 104th General Assembly. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.